Louisiana, session 2026, HB17.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:1581(11), 1631(F)(1) and (2)(introductory paragraph) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 11:1631(F)(2)(d) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1581. Definitions
The following words and phrases, as used in this Chapter, unless a different
meaning is plainly required by the context, shall have the following meanings:
* * *
(11) "Employer" shall mean any parish in the state of Louisiana; the state of
Louisiana, or the police jury or any other governing body of a parish or political
corporation or subdivision of the state of Louisiana which employs and pays persons
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-242 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 17
as district attorneys or assistant district attorneys. "Employer" shall also mean this
retirement system and the Louisiana District Attorneys' Association.
* * *
§1631. Retirement benefits; application; eligibility requirements
* * *
F.(1) Except as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, if any member
who has retired from this system is reemployed as an employee by any district
attorney or employer in the state, his retirement benefit shall be suspended during
said employment, and he shall not be paid any benefits for the period covered by
such employment. He shall, upon such reemployment, again become an active
contributing member of the system, with the option of establishing service credit for
any period of full-time employment as district attorney or assistant district attorney
an employee since returning to such employment following retirement by payment
into the system the employer and employee amount plus interest that would have
been withheld and paid into the system for that period based upon his total salary for
such period. He shall accrue a supplemental retirement benefit based on his service
rendered after reemployment. If the member continues employment after retirement
for a period of less than sixty months, his supplemental monthly retirement benefit
shall equal the benefit calculated under R.S. 11:1632 or 1633, whichever is
applicable, based on the lesser of his average final compensation at his original
retirement date or his average final compensation during the period of his subsequent
reemployment. If the member continues in employment after retirement for a period
of sixty months or more, his supplemental monthly retirement benefit shall equal the
benefit calculated under R.S. 11:1632 or 1633, whichever is applicable, based on his
average final compensation during his period of reemployment. Upon retirement
subsequent to reemployment, his benefit shall be equal to the benefits he was
receiving immediately prior to reemployment plus the supplemental benefit earned
during his reemployment.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-242 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 17
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the
benefit of a retiree shall not be suspended during reemployment as an employee by
any district attorney or employer in this state, and he shall not be considered a
member, earn additional service credit, or be required to pay contributions, if he
meets all of the following requirements:
* * *
(d)(i) Beginning January 31, 2027, through June 30, 2031, each employer
shall submit an annual report to the retirement system concerning retirees employed
under the provisions of this Subsection for the previous calendar year.
(ii) The report shall be submitted to the retirement system no later than
March first.
(iii) The report shall include each employee's name, date of retirement, date
of reemployment, annual earnings paid by local funds, and annual earnings paid by
state funds. The retirement system may adopt a uniform template for the report.
* * *